Hawaii statutes.
§26-6 Department of accounting and general
services. (a) The department of accounting and general services shall be
headed by a single executive to be known as the comptroller.

(b) The department shall:

(1) Preaudit and conduct after-the-fact
audits of the financial accounts of all state departments to determine the
legality of expenditures and the accuracy of accounts;

(2) Report to the governor and to each
regular session of the legislature as to the finances of each department of the
State;

(3) Administer the state risk management
program;

(4) Establish and manage motor pools;

(5) Manage the preservation and disposal of
all records of the State;

(6) Undertake the program of centralized
engineering and office leasing services, including operation and maintenance and
lease buyback processing pursuant to subsection (d) of public buildings, for
departments of the State;

(7) Undertake the functions of the state
surveyor;

(8) Establish accounting and internal
control systems;

(9) Under the direction of the chief
information officer, provide centralized computer information management and
processing services;

(10) Establish a program to provide a means
for public access to public information and develop an information network for
state government; and

(11) Assume administrative responsibility for the
office of information practices.

(c) The state communication system shall be
established to:

(1) Facilitate implementation of the State's
distributed information processing and information resource management plans;

(2) Improve data, voice, and video communications in
state government;

(3) Provide a means for connectivity among the state,
university, and county computer systems; and

(4) Provide a long-term means for public access to
public information.

(d) The department shall establish,
coordinate, and manage a program to facilitate facility agreements between the
State and private investors for the sale of facilities, excluding facilities
managed or controlled by the department of transportation, to private
investors; provided that each facility agreement contains the following
requirements:

(1) The State shall sell the facility to the private
investor, who shall:

(A) Renovate, improve, or construct a
facility for the State and may maintain the facility; and

(B) Lease the facility to the State, pursuant
to a building lease;

(2) The land upon which the facility rests shall not
be sold to the private investor; provided that the land may be leased at a
nominal rate to the private investor for a term that would, at a minimum, allow
the private investor to recover the capital investment that has been made to
the facility, including depreciation; and

(3) The State shall have the option of purchasing the
facility from the private investor for the remaining balance of the debt
service costs incurred by the private investor at any time.

For purposes of this subsection:

"Building lease" means a contract
between the department of accounting and general services and a private
investor in which the private investor leases an improved facility to the
department for a specified period of time.

"Facility" means a building under the
management and control of any state department.

"Facility agreement" means an
agreement between the State and a private investor that, at a minimum, includes
a description of the work to be done, the sale price for the facility, the
duration of the agreement, the roles and responsibilities of the State and the
private investor, and the terms and conditions for the lease.

"Private investor" means a
nongovernmental entity.

(e) The department may adopt rules as may be
necessary or desirable for the operation and maintenance of public buildings;
for the operation and implementation of a program to provide a means for public
access to the State's information network system and public information; and
for the implementation of facility agreements pursuant to subsection (d). The
rules shall be adopted pursuant to chapter 91.

(f) The King Kamehameha celebration commission
shall be placed within the department of accounting and general services for
administrative purposes. The functions, duties, and powers, subject to the
administrative control of the comptroller, and the composition of the
commission shall be as heretofore provided by law.

(g) The functions and authority heretofore
exercised by the comptroller, board of commissioners of public archives, the
archivist, the disposal committee, and the insurance management, surplus
property management, and central purchasing functions of the bureau of the
budget and the nonhighway functions of the department of public works as
heretofore constituted are transferred to the department of accounting and
general services established by this chapter.

(h) The department of accounting and general
services shall preserve and protect Washington Place, including the grounds and
the historic residence situated on its premises at Miller and Beretania Streets
in Honolulu. The department shall administer, manage, operate, and maintain
Washington Place and the trust fund created under subsection (i).

(i) There is established a trust fund in the
state treasury to be known as the Washington Place trust fund, into which shall
be deposited:

(1) All rents and fees collected for the use of
Washington Place and from activities conducted on the premises;

(2) All other money received for the fund from any
other source; and

(3) All income and interest earned or accrued on
moneys deposited into the trust fund.

All moneys deposited into the trust fund shall
be expended by the department of accounting and general services and used
exclusively to implement the provisions of subsection (h), including for staff
salaries and fringe benefits, and shall not be transferred, nor subject to
transfer, to the general fund or any other fund in the state treasury. [L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §12; am L 1963, c 77, §2; Supp, §14A-11; HRS §26-6; am L 1970, c
19, §1; am L 1981, c 82, §6; am L 1994, c 45, §1 and c 186, §2; am L 1995, c
126, §1; am L 2005, c 22, §1; am L 2013, c 113, §1; am L 2015, c 92, §2 and c
177, §3; am L 2016, c 58, §2]

Note

Comprehensive system for asset management of public
buildings, facilities, and sites. L 2011, c 54; L 2013, c 110.

Consolidation of functions, duties, etc. of the office of
information management and technology and the information and communication
services division under the office of enterprise technology services. L 2016,
c 58, §§8 to 11.

Cross References

Access Hawaii committee (management of State's internet
portal), see chapter 27G.

Use of vacant department facilities for public charter
schools, see §302D-35.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next